Indiana, session 2026, HB1259.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 4-23-7.3-5.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5.5. As used in this chapter,
"governmental boundary units" includes:
(1) the geographic boundaries of a political subdivision;
(2) the geographic boundaries of a taxing district (as defined
by IC 6-1.1-1-20); and
(3) any geographic boundaries related to the operation of the
statewide 911 system under IC 36-8-16.7.
SECTION 2. IC 4-23-7.3-16, AS AMENDED BY P.L.134-2021,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. With money from the fund, the state GIS
officer, through the data center, the IGIC, and the other organizations,
shall do the following:
(1) Ensure that there are adequate depositories of all GIS data and
2026 IN 1259—LS 6951/DI 125


framework data obtained by a state agency.
(2) Acquire, publish, store, and distribute GIS data and
framework data through the computer gateway administered
under IC 4-13.1-2-2(a)(6) by the office of technology and through
the state data center. The state GIS officer may also provide
access through the IGIC and other entities as directed by the state
GIS officer.
(3) Integrate GIS data and framework data developed and
maintained by state agencies and political subdivisions into the
statewide base map. State agencies and political subdivisions
shall cooperate and participate as requested by the state GIS
officer to carry out this subdivision.
(4) Maintain a state historical archive of GIS data, framework
data, and electronic maps.
(5) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, provide public
access to GIS data and framework data in locations throughout
Indiana.
(6) Provide assistance to state agencies and political subdivisions
regarding public access to GIS data and framework data so that
information is available to the public while confidentiality is
protected for certain data from electronic maps.
(7) Develop and maintain statewide framework data layers
associated with a statewide base map or electronic map.
(8) Publish and distribute the state GIS data standards and the
statewide data integration plan adopted under section 14(2) of this
chapter.
(9) Subject to section 20 of this chapter, make GIS data,
framework data, and electronic maps available for use by the
Indiana Business Research Center.
SECTION 3. IC 4-23-7.3-20, AS ADDED BY P.L.198-2007,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 20. (a) Except as provided in subsections (b), (c),
and (d), a political subdivision maintains the right to control the sale,
exchange, and distribution of any GIS data or framework data provided
by the political subdivision to the state through a data exchange
agreement entered into under this chapter.
(b) A political subdivision may agree, through a provision in a data
exchange agreement, to allow the sale, exchange, or distribution of GIS
data or framework data provided to the state.
(c) Subsection (a) does not apply to data that is otherwise required
by state or federal law to be provided by a political subdivision to the
state or federal government.
2026 IN 1259—LS 6951/DI 125


(d) As a condition in a data exchange agreement for providing state
GIS data or framework data to a political subdivision, The state GIS
officer may require the political subdivision to follow the state GIS data
standards and the statewide data integration plan when the political
subdivision makes use of the GIS data or framework data as provided
by the state.
SECTION 4. IC 6-3.6-2-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 95, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2028]: Sec. 2. "Adjusted gross income" has the meaning
set forth in IC 6-3-1-3.5. However:
(1) in the case of a resident local taxpayer of Perry County, or a
resident of a municipality located in Perry County in the case
of a local income tax imposed under IC 6-3.6-6-22 or
IC 6-3.6-6-22.5, the term does not include adjusted gross income
described in IC 6-3.6-8-7; and
(2) in the case of a local taxpayer described in section 13(3) of
this chapter, the term includes only that part of the individual's
total income that:
(A) is apportioned to Indiana under IC 6-3-2-2.7 or
IC 6-3-2-3.2; and
(B) is paid to the individual as compensation for services
rendered in the county (or municipality in the case of a local
income tax imposed under IC 6-3.6-6-22) as a team member
or race team member.
SECTION 5. IC 6-3.6-2-13, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 100, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2028]: Sec. 13. "Local taxpayer" means
any of the following:
(1) As it relates to a particular county (or municipality in the case
of a local income tax imposed under IC 6-3.6-6-22), an individual
who resides in that county (or municipality in the case of a local
income tax imposed under IC 6-3.6-6-22) on the date specified in
IC 6-3.6-8-3.
(2) As it relates to a particular county, and except for an
individual described in subdivision (3), an individual who
maintains the taxpayer's principal place of business or
employment in that county on the date specified in IC 6-3.6-8-3
and who does not reside on that same date in another county in
Indiana in which a tax under this article is in effect. However, for
purposes of a local income tax imposed by a county under
IC 6-3.6-6-2(b)(4) or imposed by a municipality under
IC 6-3.6-6-22, the term does not include an individual described
2026 IN 1259—LS 6951/DI 125


in this subdivision.
(3) As it relates to a particular county (or municipality in the
case of a local income tax imposed under IC 6-3.6-6-22 or
IC 6-3.6-6-22.5), and only for purposes of a rate imposed by a
county under 6-3.6-6-2(b)(3), the term includes an individual
who:
(A) has income apportioned to Indiana as:
(i) a team member under IC 6-3-2-2.7; or
(ii) a race team member under IC 6-3-2-3.2;
for services rendered in the county (or municipality in the
case of a local income tax imposed under IC 6-3.6-6-22 or
IC 6-3.6-6-22.5); and
(B) is not described in subdivision (1). or (2).
SECTION 6. IC 6-3.6-2-15, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 101, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2028]: Sec. 15. "Resident local taxpayer",
as it relates to a particular county (or municipality in the case of a local
income tax imposed under IC 6-3.6-6-22), means any local taxpayer
who resides in that county (or municipality in the case of a local
income tax imposed under IC 6-3.6-6-22) on the date specified in
IC 6-3.6-8-3. For purposes of a local income tax rate imposed by a
county under IC 6-3.6-6-2(b)(4), the term means an individual who
resides in the part of the county for which the county may impose
a rate under IC 6-3.6-6-2(b)(4) on the date specified in IC 6-3.6-8-3.
SECTION 7. IC 6-3.6-2-16.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16.5. "State GIS officer" has the
meaning set forth in IC 4-23-7.3-10.
SECTION 8. IC 6-3.6-3-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 102, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 1. (a) The fiscal body of the county
is the adopting body for a county.
(b) The fiscal body of the city or town is the adopting body for a city
or town for purposes of adopting a municipal rate under IC 6-3.6-6-22
and IC 6-3.6-6-22.5.
SECTION 9. IC 6-3.6-3-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.159-2020,
SECTION 54, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) An adopting body or, if authorized by this
article, another governmental entity that is not an adopting body, may
take an action under this article only by ordinance, unless this article
permits the action to be taken by resolution.
(b) The department of local government finance, in consultation
2026 IN 1259—LS 6951/DI 125


with the department of state revenue, may make electronically available
uniform notices, ordinances, and resolutions that an adopting body or
other governmental entity may use to take an action under this article.
An adopting body or other governmental entity may submit a proposed
notice, ordinance, or resolution to the department of local government
finance for review not later than thirty (30) days prior to the date that
the adopting body or governing body intends to submit the notice,
adopting ordinance or resolution, and vote results on an ordinance or
resolution under subsection (d). If the adopting body or other
governmental entity wishes to submit the proposed notice, ordinance,
or resolution to the department of local government finance for review,
the adopting body or other governmental entity shall submit the
proposed notice, ordinance, or resolution to the department of local
government finance on the prescribed forms. The department of local
government finance shall provide to the submitting entity a
determination of the appropriateness of the proposed notice, ordinance,
or resolution, including recommended modifications, within thirty (30)
days of receiving the proposed notice, ordinance, or resolution.
(c) An ordinance or resolution adopted under this article must
comply with the notice and hearing requirements set forth in IC 5-3-1.
(d) The department of local government finance shall prescribe the
procedures to be used by the adopting body or governmental entity for
submitting to the department the notice, the adopting ordinance or
resolution, and the vote results on an ordinance or resolution. The
department of local government finance shall notify the submitting
entity within thirty (30) days after submission whether the department
has received the necessary information required by the department. A
final action taken by an adopting body or governmental entity under
this article to impose a new tax or amend an existing tax is not effective
until the department of local government finance notifies the adopting
body or governmental entity that it has received the required
information from the submitting entity.
(e) Beginning after June 30, 2027, an adopting body for a county
shall provide notice of an adopting ordinance to impose a local
income tax under IC 6-3.6-6-2(b)(1), including the tax rate and the
vote results on the ordinance, to each municipality (as defined in
IC 6-3.6-6-22(a)) located in the county not later than two (2)
business days following the meeting at which the vote was taken.
(f) Not later than July 1 each year, the county auditor shall
certify to the department of local government finance and to the
state GIS officer which taxing units impose a tax rate in each
taxing district in the county.
2026 IN 1259—LS 6951/DI 125


SECTION 10. IC 6-3.6-3-2.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 2.5. (a) As used in this section,
"debt service obligations" refers to:
(1) the principal and interest payable during a calendar year
on bonds; and
(2) lease rental payments payable during a calendar year on
leases;
of a county, city, or town payable from local income taxes.
(b) Before August 1 of each calendar year, the fiscal officer of
each county, city, and town shall provide the department of local
government finance with the:
(1) total amount of the county's, city's, or town's debt service
obligations payable from local income tax revenues that will
be due in the ensuing year; and
(2) total local income tax rate in effect in the current calendar
year.
(c) The department of local government finance shall annually
determine whether each county, city, or town with debt service
obligations due in the ensuing year has timely submitted to the
department of local government finance the information required
under section 2(d) of this chapter.
SECTION 11. IC 6-3.6-3-3.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 3.5. (a) As used in this section,
"municipality" has the meaning set forth in IC 6-3.6-6-22(a).
(b) An ordinance adopted by a municipality under
IC 6-3.6-6-22.5 to impose a tax rate takes effect as provided in this
section.
(c) An ordinance adopted on or before October 20 of a calendar
year shall take effect on January 1 of the calendar year that
immediately succeeds the year in which the ordinance is adopted.
(d) An ordinance adopted after October 20 of a calendar year,
but before January 20 of the immediately succeeding calendar
year, shall take effect on January 1 of the second succeeding
calendar year.
SECTION 12. IC 6-3.6-3-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 105, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 4. (a) Except for a tax rate that has
an expiration date, and except as provided in section 3(f) of this chapter
(before its expiration), a tax rate remains in effect until the effective
date of an ordinance that increases, decreases, or rescinds that tax rate.
2026 IN 1259—LS 6951/DI 125


(b) A tax rate may not be changed more than once each year under
this article.
(c) A local income tax expenditure tax rate that is imposed in a
county under IC 6-3.6-6 continues in effect after December 31, 2027,
only if the adopting body adopts an ordinance to renew the expenditure
tax rate beginning January 1, 2028. However, if there are bonds or
leases outstanding that are payable from a tax imposed under
IC 6-3.6-6 and the adopting body fails to adopt an ordinance to
continue the expenditure tax rate under this subsection, the
expenditure tax rate for the county beginning January 1, 2028,
shall be the minimum tax rate necessary to produce one and
twenty-five hundredths (1.25) times the sum of the:
(1) highest annual outstanding debt service;
(2) highest annual lease payments; and
(3) any amount required under the agreements for the bonds
or leases to be deposited in a sinking fund or other reserve;
but only until the maturity date of those debt obligations. An
ordinance under this subsection must be adopted by the adopting body
on or before October 1, 2027, as set forth in section 3(b)(1) of this
chapter. However, this subsection shall not be construed to prohibit an
adopting body that fails to adopt an ordinance to continue an
expenditure tax rate after December 31, 2027, from adopting an
ordinance under this article to impose, renew, or modify an expenditure
tax rate under IC 6-3.6-6 beginning January 1, 2029, or any year
thereafter.
SECTION 13. IC 6-3.6-3-12 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2027]: Sec. 12. (a) This section applies to an ordinance adopted
under this article after June 30, 2027.
(b) This subsection applies only to an ordinance adopted
between January 1 and August 2 of a calendar year or October 2
and December 31 of a calendar year. If an adopting body adopts an
ordinance to impose a local income tax under:
(1) IC 6-3.6-6-2(b)(1) through IC 6-3.6-6-2(b)(4);
(2) IC 6-3.6-6-22;
(3) IC 6-3.6-6-22.5; or
(4) IC 6-3.6-7;
that exceeds the applicable maximum tax rate or applicable
maximum aggregate tax rate allowable pursuant to IC 6-3.6-6-2,
IC 6-3.6-6-22, IC 6-3.6-6-22.5, or IC 6-3.6-7, the department of
local government finance shall notify the adopting body and county
fiscal officer or municipal fiscal officer, as applicable, not later
2026 IN 1259—LS 6951/DI 125


than thirty (30) days after the adopting body submits the ordinance
and information required under IC 6-3.6-6-2 that one (1) or more
tax rates exceed the maximum allowable tax rate.
(c) This subsection applies only to an ordinance adopted
between January 1 and August 2 of a calendar year or October 2
and December 31 of a calendar year. Not later than thirty (30) days
after receiving a notification under subsection (b) from the
department of local government finance, the adopting body may
adopt an ordinance correcting the applicable tax rate or tax rates.
The following apply to an ordinance adopted under this subsection:
(1) Any statutory requirements for an ordinance that
otherwise apply to an ordinance adopted under this article to
impose a local income tax rate also apply to an ordinance
adopted under this subsection.
(2) If the tax rate or tax rates adopted in an ordinance
adopted under this subsection still exceed a maximum
allowable tax rate or maximum allowable aggregate tax rate,
the ordinance adopted under this subsection shall be
considered void and treated as if the adopting body did not
adopt any additional ordinance under this subsection.
(3) An ordinance adopted under this subsection has the same
effective date as the initial ordinance described in subsection
(b).
(d) If an adopting body adopts an ordinance between August 2
and October 2 of a calendar year to impose a local income tax that
exceeds a maximum allowable tax rate or rates, fails to adopt an
ordinance correcting the applicable tax rate or tax rates under
subsection (c), or, in the case of an ordinance described in
subsection (c)(2), the tax rate or rates will be reduced according to
the following:
(1) If a tax rate or tax rates imposed pursuant to
IC 6-3.6-6-2(b)(1) through IC 6-3.6-6-2(b)(4), IC 6-3.6-6-22,
IC 6-3.6-6-22.5, or IC 6-3.6-7 exceed the maximum allowable
rate specified in IC 6-3.6-6-2(b)(1) through IC 6-3.6-6-2(b)(4),
IC 6-3.6-6-22, IC 6-3.6-6-22.5, or IC 6-3.6-7, the tax rate or
tax rates that exceed the maximum allowable rate shall be
reduced to the maximum allowable rate without further
action by the adopting body.
(2) If the tax rates imposed pursuant to IC 6-3.6-6-2(b)(1)
through IC 6-3.6-6-2(b)(4) exceed the maximum allowable
aggregate rate of two and nine-tenths percent (2.9%) in
IC 6-3.6-6-2(b) or if the tax rates imposed pursuant to
2026 IN 1259—LS 6951/DI 125


IC 6-3.6-6-2(b)(1) through IC 6-3.6-6-2(b)(3) exceed the
maximum allowable aggregate rate in IC 6-3.6-6-2(c), the tax
rates shall be reduced to the applicable maximum allowable
rate under IC 6-3.6-6-2(b) in the following order:
(A) IC 6-3.6-6-2(b)(1);
(B) IC 6-3.6-6-2(b)(4), if applicable;
(C) IC 6-3.6-6-2(b)(2); and
(D) IC 6-3.6-6-2(b)(3).
(3) If the tax rate or rates exceed both the maximum allowable
rate specified in IC 6-3.6-6-2(b)(1) through IC 6-3.6-6-2(b)(4),
IC 6-3.6-6-22, IC 6-3.6-6-22.5, or IC 6-3.6-7 and the maximum
allowable aggregate tax rate in IC 6-3.6-6-2(b) or
IC 6-3.6-6-2(c), the tax rates shall first be reduced in the
manner set forth in subdivision (1) before application of the
reduction manner set forth in subdivision (2).
(4) Any tax rate reduction under this subsection has the same
effective date as the initial ordinance described in subsection
(b).
SECTION 14. IC 6-3.6-4-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 113, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2028]: Sec. 1. (a) Except as otherwise
provided in IC 6-3.6-6-22 and IC 6-3.6-6-22.5, a tax is imposed on the
adjusted gross income of local taxpayers at a tax rate that is a sum of
the tax rates imposed by the county's adopting body and in effect in the
county.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in IC 6-3.6-6-2, IC 6-3.6-6-22,
and IC 6-3.6-6-22.5, the combined tax rates imposed under IC 6-3.6-5
(before its expiration), IC 6-3.6-6, and IC 6-3.6-7 constitute the tax
imposed on the adjusted gross income of local taxpayers in the county.
(c) In addition to the tax imposed in the county under subsection (a),
a tax is imposed on the adjusted gross income of local taxpayers in a
municipality at a tax rate that is imposed by the municipality under
IC 6-3.6-6-22 and IC 6-3.6-6-22.5, and in effect in the municipality.
SECTION 15. IC 6-3.6-6-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 118, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 2. (a) This section applies to all
counties.
(b) The adopting body may by ordinance and subject to subsections
(c) through (e) impose one (1) or more of the following component
rates not to exceed a total expenditure tax rate under this chapter of two
and nine-tenths percent (2.9%) on the adjusted gross income of
taxpayers who reside in the county, or, in the case of a team member
2026 IN 1259—LS 6951/DI 125


or race team member described in IC 6-3.6-2-13(3), on the adjusted
gross income earned as a team member or race team member in
the county:
(1) A tax rate not to exceed one and two-tenths percent (1.2%) for
general purpose revenue for county services (as provided in
section 4 of this chapter), subject to subsection (c).
(2) A tax rate not to exceed four-tenths of one percent (0.4%) for
providers of fire protection and or emergency medical services
located within the county (as provided in section 4.3 of this
chapter), subject to subsection (c).
(3) A tax rate not to exceed two-tenths of one percent (0.2%) for
general purpose revenue for distribution to nonmunicipal civil
taxing units (excluding fire protection districts) located within the
county (as provided in section 4.5 of this chapter), subject to
subsection (c).
(4) A tax rate not to exceed one and two-tenths percent (1.2%) for
general purpose revenue for municipal services for distribution to
municipalities located within the county:
(A) that are not eligible to adopt a municipal tax rate under
section 22 of this chapter; or
(B) that, in the case of a county local income tax rate and
distribution of revenue from the tax rate in the years
before January 1, 2033, have made an election under section
23(b)(3) of this chapter to be treated as such.
The adopting body shall identify in the ordinance each taxing
district in which each tax rate is imposed.
(c) The combined component rates imposed by an adopting body
under subsection (b)(1) through (b)(3) shall not exceed one and
seven-tenths percent (1.7%).
(d) Except as provided in section 24 of this chapter, a tax rate
adopted under subsection (b)(4) may only be imposed on taxpayers
who do not reside in a municipality that is eligible to adopt a municipal
tax rate under section 22 of this chapter. In the case of a team
member or race team member described in IC 6-3.6-2-13(3), a tax
rate adopted under subsection (b)(4) may only be imposed on
services performed as a team member or race team member at a
location if the county could impose the tax rate on an individual
residing at that location.
(e) Beginning after December 31, 2030, A tax rate imposed under
subsection (b) shall expire expires on December 31, 2029, and on
December 31 of each every fourth calendar year thereafter. An
adopting body wishing to continue, increase, or decrease a tax rate in
2026 IN 1259—LS 6951/DI 125


for the succeeding four (4) year cycle must pass an ordinance to
readopt a tax rate in accordance with IC 6-3.6-3-3. However, if there
are bonds, leases, or other obligations payable from a tax imposed
under subsection (b) that remain outstanding and the adopting
body fails to adopt an ordinance to continue the expenditure tax
rate under this subsection, the expenditure tax rate for the county
for the succeeding four (4) year cycle, or until the maturity date of
those debt obligations, whichever is sooner, shall be the minimum
tax rate necessary to produce one and twenty-five hundredths
(1.25) times the sum of the:
(1) highest annual outstanding debt service;
(2) highest annual lease payments; and
(3) any amount required under the agreements for the bonds
or leases to be deposited in a sinking fund or other reserve;
for each year of the four (4) year cycle. Subject to IC 6-3.6-4-3, an
adopting body wishing to increase or decrease a tax rate during a
four (4) year cycle must pass an ordinance to increase or decrease
the tax rate in accordance with IC 6-3.6-3-3. This subsection applies
regardless of whether there is a modification in the tax rate or the
component rates or the rates are unchanged from the previous year.
SECTION 16. IC 6-3.6-6-2.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 2.2. (a) As used in this section,
"ADM" has the meaning set forth in IC 20-43-1-6.
(b) Subject to section 2(b)(1) of this chapter, an adopting body
may, by ordinance, impose a component tax rate that is a part of
the county's total general purpose rate imposed under section
2(b)(1) of this chapter for the purpose of providing distributions to
school corporations with territory in the county. A component tax
rate imposed under this section:
(1) may not exceed twelve hundredths percent (0.12%) in
calendar year 2028;
(2) may not exceed nine hundredths percent (0.09%) in
calendar year 2029;
(3) may not exceed six hundredths percent (0.06%) in
calendar year 2030; and
(4) may not exceed three hundredths percent (0.03%) in
calendar year 2031.
(c) Revenue received from a component tax rate imposed under
section must be distributed according to the following formula:
STEP ONE: Determine, for each school corporation with
territory in the county, the school corporation's certified fall
2026 IN 1259—LS 6951/DI 125


ADM count in the calendar year immediately preceding the
calendar year in which the distribution is made, excluding the
number of students who:
(A) receive more than fifty percent (50%) virtual
instruction; or
(B) attend the school corporation but reside in a different
county.
STEP TWO: Determine the aggregate sum of all the STEP
ONE results.
STEP THREE: For each school corporation, divide the:
(A) STEP ONE result for the school corporation; by
(B) STEP TWO result.
SECTION 17. IC 6-3.6-6-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.137-2024,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) Revenue raised from a tax imposed under
this chapter shall be treated as follows:
(1) To make the following distributions:
(A) If an ordinance described in section 2.5 of this chapter is
in effect in a county, to make a distribution to the county equal
to the amount of revenue generated by the rate imposed under
section 2.5 of this chapter.
(B) If an ordinance described in section 2.6 of this chapter is
in effect in a county, to make a distribution to the county equal
to the amount of revenue generated by the rate imposed under
section 2.6 of this chapter.
(C) If an ordinance described in section 2.7 of this chapter is
in effect in a county, to make a distribution to the county equal
to the amount of revenue generated by the rate imposed under
section 2.7 of this chapter.
(D) If an ordinance described in section 2.8 of this chapter is
in effect in a county, to make a distribution to the county equal
to the amount of revenue generated by the rate imposed under
section 2.8 of this chapter.
(E) If an ordinance described in section 2.9 of this chapter
(before its repeal) is in effect in a county, to make a
distribution to the county equal to the amount of revenue
generated by the rate imposed under section 2.9 of this
chapter.
(F) If an ordinance described in section 3.1 of this chapter
(before its expiration) is in effect in a county, to make a
distribution to the county equal to the amount of revenue
generated by the rate imposed under section 3.1 of this
2026 IN 1259—LS 6951/DI 125


chapter.
(2) After making the distributions described in subdivision (1), if
any, to make distributions to school corporations and civil taxing
units in counties that formerly imposed a tax under IC 6-3.5-1.1
(repealed). The revenue categorized from the next twenty-five
hundredths percent (0.25%) of the rate for a former tax adopted
under IC 6-3.5-1.1 (repealed) shall be allocated to school
corporations and civil taxing units. The amount of the allocation
to a school corporation or civil taxing unit shall be determined
using the allocation amounts for civil taxing units and school
corporations in the county.
(3) After making the distributions described in subdivisions (1)
and (2), the remaining revenue shall be treated as additional
revenue (referred to as "additional revenue" in this chapter).
Additional revenue may not be considered by the department of
local government finance in determining:
(A) any taxing unit's maximum permissible property tax levy
limit under IC 6-1.1-18.5; or
(B) the approved property tax rate for any fund.
(b) In the case of a civil taxing unit that has pledged the tax from
additional revenue for the payment of bonds, leases, or other
obligations as reported by the civil taxing unit under IC 5-1-18, the
adopting body may not, under section 4 of this chapter, reduce the
proportional allocation of the additional revenue that was allocated in
the preceding year if the reduction for that year would result in an
amount less than the amount necessary for the payment of bonds,
leases, or other obligations payable or required to be deposited in a
sinking fund or other reserve in that year for the bonds, leases, or other
obligations for which the tax from additional revenue has been pledged.
To inform an adopting body with regard to allocations that affect the
payment of bonds, leases, or other obligations, a taxing unit may
provide the adopting body with information regarding any outstanding
bonds, leases, or other obligations that are secured by additional
revenue. The information must be provided before the date of the
public hearing at which the adopting body may change the allocation
of additional revenue under section 4 of this chapter.
SECTION 18. IC 6-3.6-6-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 126, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 4. (a) General purpose revenue
raised from a tax rate under section 2(b)(1) of this chapter must be
distributed directly to the county. The money may be used by the
county fiscal body for any of the purposes of the county, including for:
2026 IN 1259—LS 6951/DI 125


(1) public safety, including funding for a PSAP;
(2) economic development purposes described in IC 6-3.6-10;
(3) acute care hospitals;
(4) correctional facilities and rehabilitation facilities; and
(5) county staff expenses of the state judicial system. and
(6) homestead property tax credits to fund replacement of the
county's property tax levy.
(b) Subject to sections 3 and 5 of this chapter, the adopting body
shall, by ordinance, determine how general purpose revenue from a tax
under this chapter must be allocated in subsequent years. The
allocations are subject to IC 6-3.6-11. The ordinance must be adopted
as provided in IC 6-3.6-3 and takes effect and applies as specified in
IC 6-3.6-3-3. The ordinance continues to apply thereafter until it is
rescinded or modified.
SECTION 19. IC 6-3.6-6-4.3, AS ADDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 127, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 4.3. (a) Revenue raised from a tax
rate for fire protection and or emergency medical services under
section 2(b)(2) of this chapter shall be distributed by the county to
among the county and each fire protection district, fire protection
territory, and municipal fire department located within the county that
provides fire protection, emergency medical services, or both in the
county. Except as provided in subsection (b), at the discretion of the
county council, the county may distribute revenue raised from a tax rate
for fire protection and or emergency medical services under section
2(b)(2) of this chapter to township fire departments and volunteer fire
departments that provide fire protection, emergency medical
services, or both in the county.
(b) Revenue raised from a tax rate for fire protection and emergency
medical services under section 2(b)(2) of this chapter shall be allocated
to each fire protection district, fire protection territory, municipal fire
department, and, if applicable, township fire departments and volunteer
fire departments, based on the following formula:
STEP ONE: For each provider of fire protection and emergency
medical services located within the county that is eligible to
receive revenue under this section, determine the population
living within the service boundaries of the provider using the
most recent federal decennial census.
STEP TWO: For each provider of fire protection and emergency
medical services located within the county that is eligible to
receive revenue under this section, determine the number of
square miles within the service boundaries of the provider.
2026 IN 1259—LS 6951/DI 125


STEP THREE: For each provider of fire protection and
emergency medical services located within the county that is
eligible to receive revenue under this section, determine the
product of:
(A) the STEP TWO amount; multiplied by
(B) twenty (20).
STEP FOUR: For each provider of fire protection and emergency
medical services located within the county that is eligible to
receive revenue under this section, determine the sum of:
(A) the STEP ONE result; plus
(B) the STEP THREE result.
STEP FIVE: Determine the sum total of the STEP FOUR results
for each provider of fire protection and emergency medical
services located within the county that is eligible to receive
revenue under this section.
STEP SIX: The percentage of revenue that shall be distributed to
each provider of fire protection and emergency medical services
located within the county that is eligible to receive revenue under
this section is equal to:
(A) the STEP FOUR result for the provider; divided by
(B) the STEP FIVE result.
(b) Subject to subsection (d), the county may determine the
allocation method for revenue raised from a tax rate for fire
protection or emergency medical services under section 2(b)(2) of
this chapter. However, in determining the allocation method, the
county shall, for each provider of fire protection, emergency
medical services, or both in the county, consider the service
boundaries of the provider and the population living within the
service boundaries of the provider using the most recent federal
decennial census.
(c) If at least fifty percent (50%) of fire runs made by a
township fire department during the calendar year preceding by
two (2) years the calendar year in which distribution amounts are
being determined are carried out by full-time firefighters who
receive a salary of at least thirty thousand dollars ($30,000), the
county shall distribute an allocation of revenue to the township fire
department under this section.
(d) In the case of a county that provides fire protection,
emergency medical services, or both in part of the county, but not
the entire county, only the part of the county in which the county
provides the fire protection, emergency medical services, or both
are considered within the service boundaries for the county.
2026 IN 1259—LS 6951/DI 125


(e) For purposes of a distribution under this section, a
distribution to a:
(1) fire protection territory shall be made to the provider unit
of the fire protection territory; and
(2) volunteer fire department shall be made to the taxing unit
that is served by the volunteer fire department.
(f) If the population living within the service boundaries of a
provider cannot be determined using data from the United States
Census Bureau, the county may determine an estimated population
based on income tax returns that report a residence located within
the service boundaries of the provider. The county auditor shall
provide the estimated population to the department of local
government finance not later than July 15 of the calendar year that
precedes the calendar year before the year in which the
distribution is made. If the county auditor does not provide an
estimated population under this subsection, the department of local
government finance may use the most recent estimated population
provided by the county auditor or the department of state revenue.
SECTION 20. IC 6-3.6-6-4.5, AS AMENDED BY THE
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 4.5. (a) Revenue raised from a tax rate for
nonmunicipal civil taxing units under section 2(b)(3) of this chapter
may be distributed by the county to nonmunicipal civil taxing units
subject to the provisions of this section.
(b) Subject to the maximum aggregate tax rate of not more than
two-tenths of one percent (0.2%) under section 2(b)(3) of this chapter,
the adopting body may adopt a tax rate for each type of nonmunicipal
civil taxing unit, which may not exceed more than five-hundredths of
one percent (0.05%) for any given unit type. The revenue raised from
a tax rate for a specific type of nonmunicipal civil taxing unit shall be
allocated to all nonmunicipal civil taxing units of that same type
located within the county on a pro rata per capita basis, subject to
subsection (e). subsections (e) and (h).
(c) A county solid waste management district (as defined in
IC 13-11-2-47) or a joint solid waste management district (as defined
in IC 13-11-2-113) is not an eligible nonmunicipal civil taxing unit for
the purpose of receiving an allocation of general purpose revenue under
this chapter unless a majority of the members of each of the county
fiscal bodies of the counties within the district passes a resolution
approving the distribution.
(d) A resolution passed by a county fiscal body under subsection (c)
2026 IN 1259—LS 6951/DI 125


may:
(1) expire on a date specified in the resolution; or
(2) remain in effect until the county fiscal body revokes or
rescinds the resolution.
(e) A nonmunicipal civil taxing unit wishing to receive a share of
revenue under this section in a year must adopt a resolution requesting
the distribution from the county and must provide a certified copy of
the resolution to the adopting body and the state board of accounts
not later than July 1 of the year immediately preceding the distribution
year. Not later than August 1 of the year immediately preceding the
distribution year, the adopting body shall hold a public hearing on the
resolution requesting the distribution and provide the public with
notice of the time and place where the public hearing will be held. The
notice must be given in accordance with IC 5-3-1 and include a
description of the resolution requesting the distribution from the
county.
(f) If a nonmunicipal civil taxing unit adopts a resolution under this
subsection subsection (e) and provides the resolution to the adopting
body as set forth in this that subsection, the county shall distribute to
the nonmunicipal civil taxing unit an amount of revenue raised from
the tax rate under section 2(b)(3) of this chapter for the distribution
year as set forth in subsection (f). (g).
(g) If one (1) or more, but not all, nonmunicipal civil taxing units
adopt a resolution under subsection (e) requesting a distribution in a
given year, the county may either distribute the total amount of revenue
raised from the tax rate under section 2(b)(3) of this chapter to only
those nonmunicipal civil taxing units that have provided a resolution
request, or the county may distribute the total amount of revenue raised
from a tax rate under section 2(b)(3) of this chapter to all nonmunicipal
civil taxing units as set forth in this section. If no nonmunicipal civil
taxing units adopt a resolution to request a distribution in a given year,
the county may retain the revenue raised from a tax rate for
nonmunicipal civil taxing units for that year and use the revenue as
general purpose revenue for the county under section 4 of this chapter.
(h) If the population living within one (1) or more nonmunicipal
civil taxing units cannot be determined using data from the United
States Census Bureau, the county may determine an estimated
population based on income tax returns that report a residence
located within the boundaries of the nonmunicipal civil taxing
units. The county auditor shall provide the estimated population to
the department of local government finance no later than July 15
of the calendar year that precedes the calendar year before the
2026 IN 1259—LS 6951/DI 125


year in which the distribution is made. If the county auditor does
not provide an estimated population under this subsection, the
department of local government finance may use the most recent
estimated population provided by the county auditor or the
department of state revenue.
SECTION 21. IC 6-3.6-6-6.1, AS AMENDED BY THE
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 6.1. (a) Revenue raised from a tax rate for certain
cities and towns under section 2(b)(4) of this chapter may shall be
distributed by the county to those cities and towns subject to the
provisions of this section and according to the following formula:
STEP ONE: Determine the population of each city and town
located in the county, excluding the population of any
municipality that imposed a local income tax under section 22
of this chapter.
STEP TWO: Determine the aggregate sum of the STEP ONE
results.
STEP THREE: Determine the sum of:
(A) the STEP TWO result; plus
(B) the population of the unincorporated area of the
county.
STEP FOUR: Divide the STEP TWO result by the STEP
THREE result.
STEP FIVE: Multiply the STEP FOUR result by one and
five-tenths (1.5), expressed as a percentage.
STEP SIX: Multiple the STEP FIVE result by the total
amount of revenue raised from the tax rate imposed under
section 2(b)(4) of this chapter.
STEP SEVEN: For each city and town located in the county
that adopted a resolution under subsection (d) for the year,
excluding any municipality that imposed a local income tax
under section 22 of this chapter, divide:
(A) the STEP ONE result for the city or town; by
(B) the STEP TWO result.
STEP EIGHT: To determine the amount to be allocated to
each city and town located in the county that adopted a
resolution under subsection (d) for the year, excluding any
municipality that imposed a local income tax under section 22
of this chapter, multiply:
(A) the STEP SEVEN result for the city or town; by
(B) the STEP SIX result.
2026 IN 1259—LS 6951/DI 125


STEP NINE: Determine the aggregate sum of the STEP
EIGHT results for each city and town located in the county
that adopted a resolution under subsection (d) for the year,
excluding any municipality that imposed a local income tax
under section 22 of this chapter.
STEP TEN: Determine the result of:
(A) the total amount of revenue raised from the tax rate
imposed under section 2(b)(4) of this chapter; minus
(B) the STEP SIX result.
STEP ELEVEN: Determine the result of:
(A) the STEP SIX result; minus
(B) the STEP NINE result.
STEP TWELVE: To determine the amount to be allocated to
the county, determine the sum of:
(A) the STEP TEN result; plus
(B) the STEP ELEVEN result.
(b) Subject to subsection (g), the revenue raised from a tax rate
under section 2(b)(4) of this chapter shall be allocated to the cities and
towns based on the population of the city or the population of the town,
whichever is applicable, compared to the population of all the cities or
the population of all the towns, whichever is applicable, that are
eligible for a distribution, subject to subsection (d). For purposes of this
determination, section, if the boundaries of a city or town are located
in more than one (1) county, only the portion of the population of the
city or town that is located within the county imposing the tax rate
under section 2(b)(4) of this chapter shall be considered.
(c) The money may be used by the city or town fiscal body for any
of the purposes of the city or town, including public safety (as defined
in IC 6-3.6-2-14) and economic development purposes described in
IC 6-3.6-10. The city or town fiscal body may pledge its general
purpose revenue to the payment of bonds or to lease payments as set
forth in this chapter.
(d) An eligible city or town wishing to receive a share of revenue
under this section in a year must adopt a resolution requesting the
distribution from the county and must provide a certified copy of the
resolution to the adopting body and the state board of accounts not
later than July 1 of the year immediately preceding the distribution
year. Not later than August 1 of the year immediately preceding the
distribution year, the adopting body shall hold a public hearing on the
resolution requesting the distribution and provide the public with
notice of the time and place where the public hearing will be held. The
notice must be given in accordance with IC 5-3-1 and include a
2026 IN 1259—LS 6951/DI 125


description of the resolution requesting the distribution from the
county.
(e) Subject to subsection (g), If an eligible city or town adopts a
resolution under this subsection (d) and provides the resolution to the
adopting body as set forth in this subsection (d), the county shall
distribute to the eligible city or town unit an amount of revenue raised
from the tax rate under section 2(b)(4) of this chapter for the
distribution year as set forth in subsection (f). (a). If no eligible city or
town adopts a resolution to request a distribution in a given year,
the county may retain all of the revenue raised from a tax rate for
that year.
(f) The county may use any money received under this section
for the purposes described in section 4 of this chapter.
(f) Subject to subsection (g), if one (1) or more, but not all, eligible
cities or towns adopt a resolution under subsection (d) requesting a
distribution in a given year, the county may either distribute the total
amount of revenue raised from the tax rate under section 2(b)(4) of this
chapter to only those eligible cities or towns that have provided a
resolution request, or the county may distribute the total amount of
revenue raised from a tax rate under section 2(b)(4) of this chapter to
all eligible cities or towns as set forth in this section. If no eligible city
or town adopts a resolution to request a distribution in a given year, the
county may retain the revenue raised from a tax rate for the eligible city
or town for that year and use the revenue as general purpose revenue
for the county under section 4 of this chapter.
(g) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in this section, if
an adopting body that imposes a tax rate of one and two-tenths percent
(1.2%) under section 2(b)(1) of this chapter subsequently adopts an
ordinance to concurrently impose a tax rate under section 2(b)(4) of
this chapter:
(1) seventy-five percent (75%) of the revenue received from the
tax rate imposed under section 2(b)(4) of this chapter shall be
retained by the county and may be used for the purposes
described in section 4 of this chapter; and
(2) twenty-five percent (25%) of the revenue received from the
tax rate imposed under section 2(b)(4) of this chapter shall be
distributed among the eligible cities and towns as set forth in this
section and may be used for the purposes set forth in this section.
However, the adopting body may, by ordinance, determine to allocate
any percentage of the revenue that would otherwise be retained by the
county under subdivision (1) to instead be allocated among the eligible
cities and towns under subdivision (2).
2026 IN 1259—LS 6951/DI 125


SECTION 22. IC 6-3.6-6-22, AS ADDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 147, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 22. (a) As used in this section,
"municipality" means only a city or town that:
(1) has a population of three thousand five hundred (3,500) or
more; and
(2) in the case of a city or town whose population decreased in the
most recent federal decennial census from three thousand five
hundred (3,500) or more to less than three thousand five hundred
(3,500), has elected by ordinance to continue to use its previous
population of three thousand five hundred (3,500) or more as set
forth in section 23(b)(2) of this chapter for purposes of the
allocation determination under section 6.1 of this chapter.
The term does not include a city or town that has made an election
under section 23(b)(3) of this chapter for purposes of a county local
income tax rate and distribution of revenue from the tax rate in the
years before January 1, 2033.
(b) Beginning after December 31, 2027, and except as provided by
section 24 of this chapter, the fiscal body of a municipality may by
ordinance and subject to subsection (e), impose a local income tax rate
on the adjusted gross income of local taxpayers in the municipality that
does not exceed one and two-tenths percent (1.2%).
(c) The following apply if a municipality imposes a local income tax
rate under this section:
(1) A local income tax rate imposed by a municipality under this
section applies only to local taxpayers within the territory of the
municipality.
(2) The local income tax is imposed in addition to a tax imposed
by the county in which the municipality is located in accordance
with IC 6-3.6-4-1(a) and IC 6-3.6-4-1(c).
(3) The following provisions of this article apply to a local income
tax rate imposed by a municipality under subsection (b):
(A) IC 6-3.6-3 (adoption of the tax), including the effective
date of an ordinance under IC 6-3.6-3-3.3.
(B) IC 6-3.6-4 (imposition of the tax), except that IC 6-3.6-4-2
and IC 6-3.6-4-3 do not apply.
(C) IC 6-3.6-8 (administration of the tax).
(4) A local income tax rate imposed by a municipality shall apply
to professional athletes who compete in the municipality, unless
exempted under IC 6-3-2-27.5 or other provision of law. team
members and race team members described in
IC 6-3.6-2-13(3) on the income derived from services
2026 IN 1259—LS 6951/DI 125


performed as a team member or race team member in the
municipality.
(d) The amount of the tax revenue that is from the local income tax
rate imposed under this section and that is collected for a calendar year
shall be treated as general purpose revenue and must be distributed to
the fiscal officer of the municipality that imposed the tax before July 1
of the next calendar year.
(e) Beginning after December 31, 2030, A tax rate imposed under
subsection (b) shall expire expires on December 31, 2029, and on
December 31 of each every fourth calendar year thereafter. A
municipality wishing to continue, increase, or decrease a tax rate in for
the succeeding four (4) year cycle must pass an ordinance to readopt
a tax rate in accordance with IC 6-3.6-3-3.3. However, if there are
bonds, leases, or other obligations payable from a tax imposed
under subsection (b) that remain outstanding and the municipality
fails to adopt an ordinance to continue the expenditure tax rate
under this subsection, the expenditure tax rate for the municipality
for the succeeding four (4) year cycle, or until the maturity date of
those debt obligations, whichever is sooner, shall be the minimum
tax rate necessary to produce one and twenty-five hundredths
(1.25) times the sum of:
(1) the highest annual outstanding debt service;
(2) the highest annual lease payments; and
(3) any amount required under the agreements for the bonds
or leases to be deposited in a sinking fund or other reserve;
for each year of the four (4) year cycle. Subject to IC 6-3.6-4-3, a
municipality wishing to increase or decrease a tax rate during a
four (4) year cycle must pass an ordinance to increase or decrease
the tax rate in accordance with IC 6-3.6-3-3.3. This subsection
applies regardless of whether there is a modification in the tax rate or
the rate is unchanged from the previous year.
(f) A municipality that imposes a local income tax rate under
this section shall work with the county to provide the geographic
information prescribed by the state GIS officer to the state GIS
officer. The required information must be submitted to the state
GIS officer in the manner prescribed by the state GIS officer not
later than August 1 each year.
SECTION 23. IC 6-3.6-6-22.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 22.5. (a) This section applies only
to a municipality that has adopted an ordinance to impose a tax
rate of one and two-tenths percent (1.2%) in the municipality
2026 IN 1259—LS 6951/DI 125


under section 22 of this chapter.
(b) As used in this section, "municipality" has the meaning set
forth in section 22(a) of this chapter.
(c) As used in this section, "unused rate capacity" refers to the
difference between one and two-tenths percent (1.2%) and the tax
rate adopted by a county under section 2(b)(1) of this chapter for
a year.
(d) Subject to subsection (e) and IC 6-3.6-3-3.5, if:
(1) a municipality adopts an ordinance to impose a local
income tax rate of one and two-tenths percent (1.2%) for a
year under section 22 of this chapter; and
(2) the county in which the municipality is located adopts an
ordinance to impose a local income tax rate that is less than
one and two-tenths percent (1.2%) for the same year under
section 2(b)(1) of this chapter;
the fiscal body of the municipality may by ordinance, and subject
to subsection (g), impose an additional local income tax rate on the
adjusted gross income of local taxpayers in the municipality that
does not exceed a rate equal to the unused rate capacity.
(e) In the case of a municipality with territory located in more
than one (1) county with unused rate capacity, the municipality
may impose an additional local income tax rate under subsection
(d) that does not exceed a rate equal to the lowest unused rate
capacity available among the counties in which the municipality
has territory.
(f) The following apply if a municipality imposes a local income
tax rate under this section:
(1) A local income tax rate imposed by a municipality under
this section applies only to local taxpayers within the territory
of the municipality and is imposed in the same territory in
which the local income tax rate is imposed under section 22 of
this chapter.
(2) The local income tax is imposed in addition to a tax
imposed by:
(A) the county in which the municipality is located in
accordance with IC 6-3.6-4-1(a) and IC 6-3.6-4-1(c); and
(B) the municipality under section 22 of this chapter.
(3) The following provisions of this article apply to a local
income tax rate imposed by a municipality under subsection
(d):
(A) IC 6-3.6-3 (adoption of the tax), including the effective
date of an ordinance under IC 6-3.6-3-3.5.
2026 IN 1259—LS 6951/DI 125


(B) IC 6-3.6-4 (imposition of the tax), except that
IC 6-3.6-4-2 and IC 6-3.6-4-3 do not apply.
(C) IC 6-3.6-8 (administration of the tax).
(4) A local income tax rate imposed by a municipality shall
apply to team members and race team members described in
IC 6-3.6-2-13(3) on the income derived from services
performed as a team member or race team member in the
municipality.
(g) The amount of the tax revenue that is from the local income
tax rate imposed under this section and that is collected for a
calendar year shall be treated as general purpose revenue and
must be distributed to the fiscal officer of the municipality that
imposed the tax before July 1 of the next calendar year. A
municipality may not use revenue received from the local income
tax rate imposed under this section:
(1) as a pledge of money for the payment of bonds, leases, or
other obligations; or
(2) to pay debt service on outstanding bonds, leases, or other
obligations.
(h) A local income tax rate imposed by a municipality under this
section expires on December 31 of each calendar year. Subject to
the unused rate capacity, a municipality wishing to continue,
increase, or decrease a local income tax rate under this section in
a succeeding year must pass an ordinance to readopt the tax rate
in accordance with IC 6-3.6-3-3.5, if unused rate capacity exists.
SECTION 24. IC 6-3.6-6-23, AS ADDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 148, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 23. (a) This section applies in
determining the population of a city or town for the purposes of this
chapter.
(b) The following apply:
(1) Except as provided in subdivisions (2) and (3), the population
of a city or town is the population of the city or town that is
reported by the 2020 federal decennial census.
(2) Beginning after 2030, 2032, if the population of a city or town
(A) increases from a population of less than three thousand
five hundred (3,500), as reported by the immediately
preceding federal decennial census, to a population of three
thousand five hundred (3,500) or more, as reported by the
most recent federal decennial census, or, if applicable, any
corrected population count (as defined in IC 1-1-3.5-1.5)
issued for the city or town in the year succeeding the most
2026 IN 1259—LS 6951/DI 125


recent federal decennial census; or
(B) decreases from a population of three thousand five
hundred (3,500) or more, as reported by the immediately
preceding federal decennial census, to a population of less
than three thousand five hundred (3,500), as reported by the
most recent federal decennial census, or, if applicable, any
corrected population count (as defined in IC 1-1-3.5-1.5)
issued for the city or town in the year succeeding the most
recent federal decennial census,
the fiscal body of the city or town may adopt an ordinance on or
before September 1 of the calendar year immediately succeeding
two (2) years after the most recent federal decennial census to
continue to use the population of the city or town as reported by
the immediately preceding federal decennial census and the
resulting determination for the city or town under section 22 of
this chapter, notwithstanding the increase or decrease in its
population as reported by the most recent federal decennial
census as described in this subdivision. An ordinance adopted
under this subdivision shall take effect on January 1 of the
calendar year that immediately succeeds the year in which the
ordinance is adopted. The fiscal officer of the city or town shall
provide a certified copy of an ordinance adopted under this
subdivision to the department of local government finance.
(3) This subdivision applies only:
(A) for purposes of a county local income tax rate and
distribution of revenue from the tax rate in the years
before 2033; and
(B) to cities and towns with a population of more than three
thousand five hundred (3,500) or more but less than seven
thousand (7,000).
Notwithstanding any other provision, a fiscal body of a city or
town may adopt an ordinance to elect to be treated as if the city's
or town's population is less than three thousand five hundred
(3,500) for purposes of a county local income tax rate and
distribution under this chapter. An ordinance adopted under this
subdivision shall take effect on January 1 of the calendar year that
immediately succeeds the year in which the ordinance is adopted.
The fiscal officer of the city or town shall provide a certified copy
of an ordinance adopted under this subdivision to the department
of local government finance. An ordinance adopted by a city or
town under this subdivision is not revocable and shall not expire
following the next federal decennial census. expire December
2026 IN 1259—LS 6951/DI 125


31, 2032.
SECTION 25. IC 6-3.6-6-24 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2027]: Sec. 24. (a) A municipality that adopts an ordinance to
impose a local income tax rate on the adjusted gross income of
local taxpayers in the municipality under section 22 or 22.5 of this
chapter may impose the local income tax rate on taxpayers only in
a taxing district in which the municipality also imposes a property
tax rate that is subject to IC 6-1.1-17-5.
(b) If:
(1) a local income tax rate under section 22 or 22.5 of this
chapter may not be imposed in a particular taxing district in
the municipality pursuant to subsection (a); and
(2) the county in which the taxing district described in
subdivision (1) is located imposes a local income tax rate
under section 2(b)(4) of this chapter;
notwithstanding section 2(d) of this chapter, the county may
impose the local income tax rate under section 2(b)(4) of this
chapter on the adjusted gross income of local taxpayers in the
taxing district described in subdivision (1). However, an individual
is still considered a resident of the municipality for purposes of
section 23 of this chapter.
SECTION 26. IC 6-3.6-7-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2028]: Sec. 0.5. For taxable years
beginning after December 31, 2027, a tax rate imposed by a county
under this chapter may be imposed on a local taxpayer only if the
county could impose the tax rates in IC 6-3.6-6-2(b)(1) through
IC 6-3.6-6-2(b)(3) on the local taxpayer.
SECTION 27. IC 6-3.6-7-27, AS AMENDED BY P.L.197-2016,
SECTION 63, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2028]: Sec. 27. (a) This section applies only to an
eligible county, as defined in IC 8-25-1-4.
(b) If the voters of the county approve a local public question under
IC 8-25-2, the fiscal body of the county may adopt an ordinance to
provide for the use of local income tax revenues attributable to an
additional tax rate imposed under IC 6-3.6-6 to fund a public
transportation project under IC 8-25. However, a county fiscal body
shall adopt an ordinance under this subsection if required by
IC 8-25-6-10 to impose an additional tax rate on the county taxpayers
(as defined in IC 8-24-1-10) who reside in a township in which the
voters approve a public transportation project in a local public question
2026 IN 1259—LS 6951/DI 125


held under IC 8-25-6. An ordinance adopted under this subsection must
specify an additional tax rate to be imposed in the county (or township
in the case of an additional rate required by IC 8-25-6-10) of at least
one-tenth percent (0.1%), but not more than twenty-five hundredths
percent (0.25%). If an ordinance is adopted under this subsection, the
amount of the certified distribution attributable to the additional tax
rate imposed under this subsection must be:
(1) retained by the county auditor;
(2) deposited in the county public transportation project fund
established under IC 8-25-3-7; and
(3) used for the purpose provided in this subsection instead of as
a property tax replacement distribution.
(c) The tax rate under this section plus the tax rate under IC 6-3.6-6
may not exceed the tax rate may not be considered for purposes of
determining the maximum allowable tax rate specified in
IC 6-3.6-6-2.
SECTION 28. IC 6-3.6-8-3, AS ADDED BY P.L.243-2015,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) For purposes of this article, an individual
shall be treated as a resident of the county in which the individual:
(1) maintains a home, if the individual maintains only one (1)
home in Indiana;
(2) if subdivision (1) does not apply, is registered to vote;
(3) if subdivision (1) or (2) does not apply, registers the
individual's personal automobile; or
(4) spent the majority more of the individual's time in Indiana
during the taxable year in question compared to any other
county, if subdivision (1), (2), or (3) does not apply.
(b) The residence or principal place of business or employment of
an individual is to be determined on January 1 of the calendar year in
which the individual's taxable year commences. If an individual
changes the location of the individual's residence or principal place of
employment or business to another county in Indiana during a calendar
year, the individual's liability for tax is not affected.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (b), if an individual becomes a local
taxpayer for purposes of IC 36-7-27 during a calendar year because the
individual:
(1) changes the location of the individual's residence to a county
in which the individual begins employment or business at a
qualified economic development tax project (as defined in
IC 36-7-27-9); or
(2) changes the location of the individual's principal place of
2026 IN 1259—LS 6951/DI 125


employment or business to a qualified economic development tax
project and does not reside in another county in which a tax is in
effect;
the individual's adjusted gross income attributable to employment or
business at the qualified economic development tax project is taxable
only by the county containing the qualified economic development tax
project.
SECTION 29. IC 6-3.6-8-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 151, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2028]: Sec. 3. (a) For purposes of this
article, an individual shall be treated as a resident of the county (or the
municipality in the case of a local income tax imposed under
IC 6-3.6-6-22) in which the individual:
(1) maintains a home, if the individual maintains only one (1)
home in Indiana;
(2) if subdivision (1) does not apply, is registered to vote;
(3) if subdivision (1) or (2) does not apply, registers the
individual's personal automobile; or
(4) spent the majority more of the individual's time in Indiana
during the taxable year in question compared to any other
county, if subdivision (1), (2), or (3) does not apply.
(b) The residence of an individual is to be determined on January 1
of the calendar year in which the individual's taxable year commences.
If an individual changes the location of the individual's residence to
another county (or municipality in the case of a local income tax
imposed under IC 6-3.6-6-22) in Indiana during a calendar year, the
individual's liability for tax is not affected.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (b), if an individual becomes a local
taxpayer for purposes of IC 36-7-27 during a calendar year because the
individual changes the location of the individual's residence to a county
or municipality in which the individual begins employment or business
at a qualified economic development tax project (as defined in
IC 36-7-27-9), the individual's adjusted gross income attributable to
employment or business at the qualified economic development tax
project is taxable only by the county or municipality containing the
qualified economic development tax project.
(d) In determining residency for purposes of a local income tax
imposed under IC 6-3.6-6-2(b)(4), IC 6-3.6-6-22, or IC 6-3.6-6-22.5,
the following apply:
(1) The criteria in subsection (a)(1) through (a)(4) must be
applied to municipalities and the parts of a county in which
the county may impose a tax rate under IC 6-3.6-6-2(b)(4).
2026 IN 1259—LS 6951/DI 125


(2) If an individual meets the criteria in subsection (a)(1)
through (a)(3) for an area in the county in which the county
may impose a tax rate under IC 6-3.6-6-2(b)(4), the individual
is considered a resident of that area of the county and is
subject to a tax rate imposed under IC 6-3.6-6-2(b)(4).
(3) If an individual is a resident of the county pursuant to
subsection (a)(4), the:
(A) time spent in all areas within the county in which the
county may impose a tax rate under IC 6-3.6-6-2(b)(4)
shall be aggregated; and
(B) determination of the individual's residence within the
county shall be determined solely by the time spent in the
municipality (or part of the county) and the parts of a
county in which the county may impose a tax rate under
IC 6-3.6-6-2(b)(4).
SECTION 30. IC 6-3.6-8-6, AS ADDED BY P.L.243-2015,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2028]: Sec. 6. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b),
if for a particular taxable year a local taxpayer is liable for an income
tax imposed by a county, city, town, or other local governmental entity
located outside Indiana, that local taxpayer is entitled to a credit against
the tax liability imposed under this article for that same taxable year.
The amount of the credit equals the amount of tax imposed by the other
governmental entity on income derived from sources outside Indiana
and subject to the tax imposed under this article. However, the credit
provided by this section may not reduce a local taxpayer's tax liability
to an amount less than would have been owed if the income subject to
taxation by the other governmental entity had been ignored.
(b) The credit provided by this section does not apply to a local
taxpayer to the extent that the other governmental entity provides for
a credit to the taxpayer for the amount of taxes owed under this article.
(c) To claim the credit provided by this section, a local taxpayer
must provide the department with satisfactory evidence that the
taxpayer is entitled to the credit.
(d) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2027, the
credit provided by this section applies to a local taxpayer if the
local taxpayer is a team member or race team member and is
subject to a local income tax imposed by a local government entity
that is located outside Indiana.
SECTION 31. IC 6-3.6-8-7, AS ADDED BY P.L.243-2015,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2028]: Sec. 7. In the case of a local taxpayer who is a
2026 IN 1259—LS 6951/DI 125


resident of Perry County, or a resident of a municipality located in
Perry County in the case of a local income tax imposed under
IC 6-3.6-6-22 or IC 6-3.6-6-22.5, the term "adjusted gross income"
does not include adjusted gross income that is:
(1) earned in a county that is:
(A) located in another state; and
(B) adjacent to the county in which the taxpayer resides; and
(2) subject to an income tax imposed by a county, city, town, or
other local governmental entity in the other state.
SECTION 32. IC 6-3.6-9-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 158, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 5. (a) Before October 1 of each
calendar year, the budget agency shall certify to the department of local
government finance and the county auditor of each adopting county the
amount determined under sections 4 and 4.1 of this chapter. The
amount certified is the county's certified distribution for the
immediately succeeding calendar year. The amount certified shall be
adjusted, as necessary, under sections 6 and 7 of this chapter. Subject
to subsection (b), not later than thirty (30) days after receiving the
amount of the certified distribution, the department of local
government finance shall determine for each taxing unit and notify the
county auditor of the certified amount that will be distributed to the
taxing unit under this chapter during the ensuing calendar year. Not
later than thirty (30) days after receiving the department's estimate, the
county auditor shall notify each taxing unit of the certified amounts for
the taxing unit.
(b) This subsection applies to Lake County. When the department
of local government finance notifies the county auditor of the certified
amount that will be distributed to the taxing unit under this chapter
during the ensuing calendar year, the department of local government
finance shall also determine the amount of general purpose revenue
allocated for economic development purposes that will be distributed
to each civil taxing unit, reduced by an amount that is equal to the
following percentages of the tax revenue that would otherwise be
allocated for economic development purposes and distributed to the
civil taxing unit:
(1) For Lake County, an amount equal to twenty-five percent
(25%).
(2) For Crown Point, an amount equal to ten percent (10%).
(3) For Dyer, an amount equal to fifteen percent (15%).
(4) For Gary, an amount equal to seven and five-tenths percent
(7.5%).
2026 IN 1259—LS 6951/DI 125


(5) For Hammond, an amount equal to fifteen percent (15%).
(6) For Highland, an amount equal to twelve percent (12%).
(7) For Hobart, an amount equal to eighteen percent (18%).
(8) For Lake Station, an amount equal to twenty percent (20%).
(9) For Lowell, an amount equal to fifteen percent (15%).
(10) For Merrillville, an amount equal to twenty-two percent
(22%).
(11) For Munster, an amount equal to thirty-four percent (34%).
(12) For New Chicago, an amount equal to one percent (1%).
(13) For Schererville, an amount equal to ten percent (10%).
(14) For Schneider, an amount equal to twenty percent (20%).
(15) For Whiting, an amount equal to twenty-five percent (25%).
(16) For Winfield, an amount equal to fifteen percent (15%).
The department of local government finance shall notify the county
auditor of the remaining amounts to be distributed and the amounts of
the reductions that will be withheld under IC 6-3.6-11-5.5.
(c) This subsection applies to a distribution under IC 6-3.6-6-4.3
of tax revenue raised from a local income tax rate for fire
protection and emergency medical services. Before the department
of local government finance may certify a distribution, each
provider of fire protection and emergency medical services located
within a county shall certify to the department of local government
finance the boundaries of the service area within the county served
by the provider. If a provider does not certify the provider's
service area to the department of local government finance, the
department of local government finance shall use the most recent
certified net assessed valuation submitted by the county auditor
pursuant to IC 6-1.1-17-1 for the taxing unit served by the provider
to determine the service boundaries for the provider. For purposes
of this subsection, the service boundaries of a provider may not
include any area served under a mutual aid agreement.
SECTION 33. IC 36-4-3-19, AS AMENDED BY P.L.104-2022,
SECTION 160, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 19. (a) If disannexation is ordered
under this chapter by the works board of a municipality and no appeal
is taken, the clerk of the municipality shall, without compensation and
not later than ten (10) days after the order is made, make and certify a
complete transcript of the disannexation proceedings to the auditor of
each county in which the disannexed lots or lands lie and to the office
of the secretary of state. The county auditor shall list those lots or lands
appropriately for taxation. The proceedings of the works board shall not
be certified to the county auditor or to the office of the secretary of
2026 IN 1259—LS 6951/DI 125


state if an appeal to the circuit court has been taken.
(b) In all proceedings begun in or appealed to the circuit court, if
vacation or disannexation is ordered, the clerk of the court shall
immediately after the judgment of the court, or after a decision on
appeal to the supreme court or court of appeals if the judgment on
appeal is not reversed, certify the judgment of the circuit court, as
affirmed or modified, to each of the following:
(1) The auditor of each county in which the lands or lots affected
lie, on receipt of one dollar ($1) for the making and certifying of
the transcript from the petitioners for the disannexation.
(2) The office of the secretary of state.
(3) The circuit court clerk of each county in which the lands or
lots affected are located.
(4) The county election board of each county in which the lands
or lots affected are located.
(5) If a board of registration exists, the board of each county in
which the lands or lots affected are located.
(6) The office of census data established by IC 2-5-1.1-12.2.
(c) The county auditor shall forward a list of lots or lands
disannexed under this section to the following:
(1) The county highway department of each county in which the
lands or lots affected are located.
(2) The county surveyor of each county in which the lands or lots
affected are located.
(3) Each plan commission, if any, that lost or gained jurisdiction
over the disannexed territory.
(4) The township trustee of each township that lost or gained
jurisdiction over the disannexed territory.
(5) The sheriff of each county in which the lands or lots affected
are located.
(6) The office of the secretary of state.
(7) The office of census data established by IC 2-5-1.1-12.2.
(8) The department of local government finance, not later than
August 1, in the manner described by the department.
(9) The state GIS officer (as defined in IC 4-23-7.3-10), not
later than August 1, in the manner prescribed by the state
GIS officer (as defined in IC 4-23-7.3-10).
The county auditor may require the clerk of the municipality to furnish
an adequate number of copies of the list of disannexed lots or lands or
may charge the clerk a fee for photoreproduction of the list.
(d) A disannexation described by this section takes effect upon the
clerk of the municipality filing the order with:
2026 IN 1259—LS 6951/DI 125


(1) the county auditor of each county in which the annexed
territory is located; and
(2) the circuit court clerk, or if a board of registration exists, the
board of each county in which the annexed territory is located.
(e) The clerk of the municipality shall notify the office of the
secretary of state and the office of census data established by
IC 2-5-1.1-12.2 of the date a disannexation is effective under this
chapter.
SECTION 34. IC 36-4-3-22, AS AMENDED BY P.L.38-2021,
SECTION 84, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 22. (a) The clerk of the municipality shall file:
(1) each annexation ordinance against which:
(A) a remonstrance or an appeal has not been filed during the
period permitted under this chapter; or
(B) a remonstrance was filed without a sufficient number of
signatures to meet the requirements of section 11.3(c) of this
chapter, in the case of an annexation for which an annexation
ordinance was adopted after June 30, 2015; or
(2) the certified copy of a final and unappealable judgment
ordering an annexation to take place;
with the county auditor, circuit court clerk, and board of registration (if
a board of registration exists) of each county in which the annexed
territory is located, the office of the secretary of state, and the office of
census data established by IC 2-5-1.1-12.2. The clerk of the
municipality shall record each annexation ordinance adopted under this
chapter in the office of the county recorder of each county in which the
annexed territory is located.
(b) The ordinance or judgment must be filed and recorded no later
than ninety (90) days after:
(1) the expiration of the period permitted for a remonstrance or
appeal;
(2) the delivery of a certified order under section 15 of this
chapter; or
(3) the date the county auditor files the written certification with
the legislative body under section 11.2 of this chapter, in the case
of an annexation described in subsection (a)(1)(B).
(c) Failure to record the annexation ordinance as provided in
subsection (a) does not invalidate the ordinance.
(d) The county auditor shall forward a copy of any annexation
ordinance filed under this section to the following:
(1) The county highway department of each county in which the
lots or lands affected are located.
2026 IN 1259—LS 6951/DI 125


(2) The county surveyor of each county in which the lots or lands
affected are located.
(3) Each plan commission, if any, that lost or gained jurisdiction
over the annexed territory.
(4) The sheriff of each county in which the lots or lands affected
are located.
(5) The township trustee of each township that lost or gained
jurisdiction over the annexed territory.
(6) The office of the secretary of state.
(7) The office of census data established by IC 2-5-1.1-12.2.
(8) The department of local government finance, not later than
August 1, in the manner described by the department.
(9) The state GIS officer (as defined in IC 4-23-7.3-10), not
later than August 1, in the manner prescribed by the state
GIS officer (as defined in IC 4-23-7.3-10).
(e) The county auditor may require the clerk of the municipality to
furnish an adequate number of copies of the annexation ordinance or
may charge the clerk a fee for photoreproduction of the ordinance. The
county auditor shall notify the office of the secretary of state and the
office of census data established by IC 2-5-1.1-12.2 of the date that the
annexation ordinance is effective under this chapter.
(f) The county auditor or county surveyor shall, upon determining
that an annexation ordinance has become effective under this chapter,
indicate the annexation upon the property taxation records maintained
in the office of the auditor or the office of the county surveyor.
SECTION 35. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) IC 6-3.6-6-3 was
amended by P.L.137-2024, SECTION 9, effective July 1, 2024, until
July 1, 2027, and by P.L.68-2025, SECTION 124, effective July 1,
2027. The general assembly recognizes that this act amends,
effective July 1, 2026, the version of IC 6-3.6-6-3 amended by
P.L.137-2024, SECTION 9. The general assembly intends for the
version of IC 6-3.6-6-3:
(1) as amended by this act, to expire July 1, 2027; and
(2) as amended by P.L.68-2025, SECTION 124, to take effect
July 1, 2027.
(b) This SECTION expires December 31, 2027.
2026 IN 1259—LS 6951/DI 125